New Jersey, session 221, S1778.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established in the Department of the Treasury a special fund to be known as the School Aid Contribution Fund. b.    Each taxpayer shall have the opportunity to indicate on the taxpayers New Jersey gross income tax return that a portion of the taxpayers gross income tax refund or an enclosed contribution be deposited in the School Aid Contribution Fund for the purpose of funding State school aid above what is appropriated by the Legislature pursuant to P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.). c.     Any costs incurred by the Division of Taxation for collection or administration attributable to the School Aid Contribution Fund may be deducted from receipts collected pursuant to this section, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The State shall deposit net contributions collected pursuant to this section into the School Aid Contribution Fund. d.    The Legislature shall annually appropriate all funds deposited in the School Aid Contribution Fund established pursuant to subsection a. of this section to the Department of Education which shall annually distribute the monies received from the School Aid Contribution Fund to school districts pursuant to the School Funding Reform Act of 2008, P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.). Any monies appropriated from the fund to the department shall not be used to supplant the amount of State funds appropriated for State school aid in the prior fiscal year. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 next following the date of enactment.